District of Columbia statutes.
25-906

Exemption from tax.

No tax shall be levied and collected on any alcoholic beverage exempt from tax under the laws of the United States, or on any alcohol sold for nonbeverage purposes by the licensee under a manufacturer’s or wholesaler’s license in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the Council.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 332, ch. 4, § 23
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 3
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 1014, 1015, ch. 600, §§ 1, 2
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 901, 903, ch. 756, §§ 11, 17
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 135, ch. 146, title V, § 505
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 113, ch. 218, title VIII, § 801
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 81, ch. 154, title III, §§ 301, 302(a)
July 25, 1958, 72 Stat. 418, Pub. L. 85-558, §§ 1-5
Sept. 14, 1961, 75 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 87-238, §§ 1-5
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, § 401
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 855, Pub. L. 89-610, title I, § 101(a)
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 175, Pub. L. 91-106, title V, § 501(a), (b)
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(9), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 25(b), (c), 32 DCR 30
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 7(a), 36 DCR 4160
May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-119, § 2, 37 DCR 1738
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-906.
1973 Ed., § 25-124.